Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201464-119
Rules and regulations.

The Secretary
of State may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations relating to the administration
of, but not inconsistent with, the provisions of sections 64-101 to 64-118.

Laws 2012, LB398, § 7.